Utah statutes.
78B-6-1109.   Abatement by eviction order -- Grounds.
An order of abatement by eviction may issue only upon a showing by the
applicant by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(1)  the applicant will suffer irreparable harm unless the order of abatement
by eviction issues;
(2)  the threatened injury to the applicant outweighs whatever damage the
proposed order of abatement by eviction may cause the party so ordered;
(3)  the order of abatement by eviction, if issued, would not be adverse to
the public interest; and
(4)  there is a substantial likelihood that the applicant will prevail on the
merits of the underlying claim, or the case presents serious issues on the
merits which should be the subject of further litigation.
